Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1729
Foreign support order; acceptance; procedure.

Upon receiving a foreign support order and the documentation specified in section 43-1730 from an agency of another jurisdiction, an obligee, an obligor, or an attorney for either, the department shall transmit such order and documents to be filed with the clerk of the district court in the jurisdiction within this state in which income withholding is being sought. The clerk of the district court shall accept the documents filed, and such acceptance shall constitute entry of the foreign support order for purposes of income withholding.

The filing process required by this section shall not be construed as requiring an application, petition, answer, and hearing as might be required for the filing or registration of foreign judgments by the Nebraska Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act or the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 49;

Laws 1993, LB 458, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 56;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 26.

Nebraska Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act, see section 25-1587.01.

Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see section 42-701.